Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1211.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 28, 1953 (P.L.723, No.230), known as the Second Class County Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXXI-DCREATION OF UNINCORPORATED DISTRICTS FOR THEGOVERNANCE OF DISSOLVED MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONSWITHIN COUNTIES OF THE SECOND CLASSSection 3101-D. Scope of article.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 This article relates to unincorporated districts of counties of the second class.Section 3102-D. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) While the electors of this Commonwealth have long had procedures by which to create new municipalities, the General Assembly may also provide a means whereby electors of municipalities may unilaterally terminate their municipal corporations.(2) The electors residing in a municipal corporation located in a county of the second class should have the right to voluntarily dissolve their existing form of government and transfer all powers, duties and responsibilities for the governance of the municipal corporation to an unincorporated district administered by a county of the second class if the electors believe that the county would be able to provide for more efficient and effective municipal services.(3) Article IX of the Constitution of Pennsylvania authorizes the governing body of a municipality to cooperate, transfer or delegate any function, power or responsibility by mutual agreement to another municipality, district or newly created governmental unit.(4) The dissolution of the existing form of government for a municipal corporation and the substitution of an unincorporated district as a new form of government administered by the county is authorized by Article IX of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, which provides broad authority to the General Assembly to provide for local government.(5) It is appropriate for an unincorporated district to transfer administrative functions to the county under section 20250HB1211PN1359 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5 of Article IX of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, which provides that a municipality may delegate or transfer any function, power or responsibility to another municipality, including a county.(6) In recognition of the problems faced by certain municipal corporations located within counties of the second class and the shared benefits available to other municipalities, it is appropriate for the General Assembly to authorize the creation of unincorporated districts within counties of the second class.Section 3103-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administrative code." The ordinance of the county providing for the administration and operation of the county's government consistent with the county's home rule charter or a successor law or ordinance."County." A county of the second class in which a municipal corporation is entirely located."County council." The elected legislative body of a county elected in accordance with the home rule charter or a successor or successors to the legislative duties and responsibilities of the elected legislative body."County executive." The county executive of a county elected in accordance with the home rule charter or a successor or successors to the executive duties and responsibilities of the county executive."County manager." An appointed chief administrative officer of a county responsible to the county executive for the 20250HB1211PN1359 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administration of the day-to-day operations and administration of county government or a successor or successors to the operational and administrative duties and responsibilities of the chief administrative officer."Dissolution." Replacement of the existing form of governance of a municipal corporation with an unincorporated district administered by a county."Dissolved municipality." A municipal corporation whose electors have voted to voluntarily dissolve the municipal corporation's existing form of governance and to have the county assume all powers, duties and responsibilities for governance of the municipal corporation and delivery of public services through the administration of an unincorporated district."District advisory committee." A body appointed to advise a county manager concerning matters related to the governance of a dissolved municipality that has become an unincorporated district of the county."Electors." The registered voters of a municipal corporation seeking to voluntarily dissolve the existing form of governance of a municipal corporation in which the electors reside and to have the county assume all powers, duties and responsibilities for governance of the municipal corporation and delivery of public services through the administration of an unincorporated district or the registered voters in an unincorporated district of the county seeking to reestablish the dissolved municipality as a separate municipal corporation."Governing body." Any of the following:(1) The council in a city, borough or incorporated town.(2) The board of commissioners in a township of the first class.20250HB1211PN1359 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The board of supervisors in a township of the second class.(4) The elected legislative body in a home rule municipality."Home rule charter." The home rule charter of a home rule municipality, including the home rule charter of a county."Municipal corporation." A city, borough, incorporated town, township or home rule municipality with a population of 10,000 or less and located entirely in a county."Official action." A vote taken by the governing body at a public meeting."Unincorporated district." The name of the geographical territory encompassing a dissolved municipality.Section 3104-D. Initiation of municipal corporation dissolution.(a) Findings.--If the governing body of a municipal corporation finds that the residents of the municipal corporation would be better served by the administration of municipal services by the county, the governing body may seek to provide for the dissolution of the municipal corporation under this article.(b) Resolution of preliminary interest.--(1) The governing body of a municipal corporation shall indicate its interest in exploring dissolution of the municipal corporation by adopting a nonbinding resolution of preliminary interest. In the resolution, the governing body of the municipal corporation shall expressly authorize its elected and appointed officials and officers to enter into formal discussions with the county concerning the preparation of an essential services transition plan as part of an 20250HB1211PN1359 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intergovernmental cooperation agreement under the provisions of 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 23 Subch. A (relating to intergovernmental cooperation) under which the existing form of governance of the municipal corporation would be voluntarily dissolved following an affirmative vote by the electors of the municipal corporation at a referendum and all powers, duties and responsibilities for the governance of the municipal corporation and delivery of public services to the citizens residing in the municipal corporation eventually would be transferred to and exercised by the county through the administration of an unincorporated district.(2) The governing body of a municipal corporation shall transmit a certified copy of the governing body's adopted resolution of preliminary interest to the county manager.(3) Within 10 business days of receipt of the certified copy of the municipal corporation's resolution of preliminary interest, the county manager or the manager's authorized representative or delegate shall contact the authorized officer or representative of the municipal corporation to begin formal discussions on the development of an essential services transition plan as part of an intergovernmental cooperation agreement under the provisions of 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 23 (relating to general provisions) under which the existing form of governance of the municipal corporation would be dissolved and all powers, duties and responsibilities for the governance of the municipal corporation and for delivery of public services to the citizens residing in the municipal corporation would be transferred to and exercised by the county through an unincorporated district.Section 3105-D. Development of essential services transition 20250HB1211PN1359 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 plan and time period for development of plan.(a) Proposed plan and intergovernmental cooperation agreement.--The authorized representatives of the municipal corporation and the county shall confer and prepare a written proposed essential services transition plan as part of an intergovernmental cooperation agreement under the provisions of 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 23 (relating to general provisions) under which the existing form of governance of the municipal corporation would be dissolved and all powers, duties and responsibilities for the governance of the municipal corporation and delivery of public services to the citizens residing in the municipal corporation would be transferred to and exercised by the county through an unincorporated district.(b) Time period to complete proposed plan and intergovernmental cooperation agreement.--The proposed intergovernmental cooperation agreement with the proposed essential services transition plan shall be completed by the authorized representatives of the county and the municipal corporation within 180 days of the date agreed upon as the commencement date of discussions concerning the development of the essential services transition plan as part of the intergovernmental cooperation agreement.(c) Intergovernmental cooperation.--During the 180-day period of the development of the essential services transition plan as part of the intergovernmental cooperation agreement between the county and the municipal corporation, the county and the municipal corporation shall exchange information and provide records and other necessary documents as may be reasonably requested to assist in the preparation of the agreement.(d) Extension.--20250HB1211PN1359 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) If a final proposed essential services transition plan as part of the intergovernmental cooperation agreement is not completed by the end of the 180-day period under subsection (b), the time period for the development of the essential services transition plan may be extended by mutual agreement of the county and the municipal corporation for an additional 90 days.(2) If the county and the municipal corporation cannot reach an agreement on a final proposed essential services transition plan by the end of the additional 90-day period, then all discussions concerning possible dissolution of the municipal corporation and replacement of its governance by an unincorporated district administered by the county shall be concluded.(e) Costs and expenses.--The county and the municipal corporation shall bear their own costs and expenses incurred during the development of the essential services transition plan.Section 3106-D. Essential services transition plan.(a) Content.--In addition to the requirements contained in 53 Pa.C.S. § 2307 (relating to content of ordinance or resolution), the intergovernmental cooperation agreement created under section 3105-D shall include a written proposed essential services transition plan. The plan shall provide for, but not be limited to, the following matters:(1) Establishment of the name of the district. A district established by this article shall be named "The Unincorporated District of of County."(2) Disposition and handling of debts and obligations of the municipal corporation.20250HB1211PN1359 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Disposition and handling of suits, claims and demands against the municipal corporation.(4) The closing or transfer of all accounts of the municipal corporation.(5) The status, number and role of employees of the municipal corporation and modifications to or rescission of collective bargaining agreements applicable to the employees in accordance with applicable laws.(6) The disposition of each ongoing contract to which the municipal corporation is a party. The proposed essential services transition plan may provide for the disposition of each contract by making the county a successor to the contract with the assent of other parties to the contract or the termination or modification of the contract according to the contract's terms.(7) Disposition of all real and personal property and other assets of the municipal corporation by sale, lease or conveyance. The proceeds of a disposition shall be used for the exclusive benefit of the residents of the municipal corporation and may be applied for the following purposes:(i) Payment of outstanding debt obligations to the municipal corporation.(ii) Provision of municipal services to the electors of the municipal corporation.(8) A consolidation of ordinances of the municipal corporation related to the health, safety or general welfare of the residents of the district and land use that the county and the municipal corporation determine will remain in effect within the district following the dissolution of the municipal corporation.20250HB1211PN1359 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) (i) The rates of taxes and fees that shall apply in the unincorporated district beginning on the date of the dissolution of the municipal corporation.(ii) This paragraph shall apply to any tax that the municipal corporation may levy by its municipal code or the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax Enabling Act.(10) Local emergency management in accordance with the plan and program of the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency. The plan shall provide for the district in a substantially similar manner as plans required for a political subdivision under 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 75 Subch. A (relating to general provisions). The proposed essential services transition plan shall include a procedure for a declaration of a disaster emergency to be made in the district and the designation of a local coordinator of emergency management.(11) The disposition and storage of all books, records, deeds, papers and other important documents.(12) The status, funding, payment and future administration of pensions and pension plans administered by the municipal corporation or on behalf of the municipal corporation by a third party.(13) The level and mode of delivery of municipal services.(14) A proposed operating and capital budget that may include a capital improvement plan and tax and fee rates.(15) Outstanding delinquent taxes and debts and assignment of the delinquent taxes and debts for collection.(16) The formation of the district advisory committee 20250HB1211PN1359 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which shall be consistent with section 3112-D and the powers and duties provided under this article. The plan shall provide for the methods of appointment, removal and designation of a chair and terms of the members of the committee.(17) Any other matter or item determined by the county and the municipal corporation to be germane to the future governance of the municipal corporation by an unincorporated district administered by the county.(b) Public notice.--(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 23 (relating to general provisions), not less than 45 days before executing the proposed essential services transition plan as a part of an intergovernmental cooperation agreement under subsection (a), the municipal corporation shall publish in at least one newspaper of general circulation a notification of the hearing under subsection (c) and a brief summary prepared by the solicitor of the municipal corporation of the proposed intergovernmental cooperation agreement stating all the provisions of the proposed essential services transition plan between the county and the municipal corporation in reasonable detail and a reference to the office or other place where copies of the proposed intergovernmental cooperation agreement may be examined.(2) The proposed intergovernmental cooperation agreement shall also be published on the publicly accessible Internet website of the county and the municipal corporation, where the publicly accessible Internet website has been previously established.(c) Public hearing.--20250HB1211PN1359 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) At least 15 days after the publication of the notice under subsection (b), the governing body of the municipal corporation shall hold a public hearing, located in the municipal corporation, to present a summary of the proposed agreement and accept public comment on the proposed essential services transition plan.(2) Two members of county council, one of whom shall be the member who represents the municipal corporation on the county council, the county executive of the county or the county executive's designee and other representatives of the county who the county executive deems necessary shall attend the public hearing to provide information on the proposed intergovernmental cooperation agreement and to receive public comments.(d) Revisions following public hearing.--A revision made to the proposed essential services transition plan as a part of an intergovernmental cooperation agreement after the public hearing shall be made available for public examination and published on the publicly accessible Internet website as provided under subsection (b) at least 15 days prior to final approval and the execution of the agreement by the governing body of the municipal corporation.(e) Final approval of essential services transition plan.--(1) (i) The governing body of the municipal corporation shall take official action on an ordinance to adopt the final proposed intergovernmental cooperation agreement under the provisions of 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 23 at a regularly scheduled meeting or at a special meeting called to consider the final proposed agreement.(ii) If the governing body of the municipal 20250HB1211PN1359 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corporation approves the ordinance to adopt the final proposed intergovernmental cooperation agreement, the ordinance of the municipal corporation shall become effective only as provided in section 3107-D(b)(4). The municipal corporation, through its authorized representative or delegate, shall execute the final proposed intergovernmental cooperation agreement and transmit the signed agreement and certified copies of its official action approving the final proposed agreement to county council, the county executive and the county manager.(iii) If the governing body of the municipal corporation disapproves the ordinance to adopt the final proposed intergovernmental cooperation agreement, the municipal corporation shall transmit official notice of the disapproval of the final proposed agreement to the county council, the county executive and the county manager.(iv) Upon receipt of notice of disapproval of the final proposed agreement, the possible dissolution of the municipal corporation and replacement of its governance by an unincorporated district administered by the county shall be deemed to be concluded.(2) (i) Upon receipt of a certified copy of the municipal corporation's official action approving the final proposed agreement, the county council shall take official action to approve the final proposed intergovernmental cooperation agreement by enacting a county ordinance that becomes effective as provided under section 3111-D at a regularly scheduled meeting or at a 20250HB1211PN1359 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 special meeting called to consider the final proposed agreement.(ii) If the county council takes official action to approve the final proposed agreement, the county council shall submit the proposed county ordinance approving the final proposed intergovernmental cooperation agreement to the county executive for approval in accordance with the county's administrative code.(iii) If the county executive signs the county ordinance or the county council overrides a veto of the ordinance, the county manager shall execute the final intergovernmental cooperation agreement on behalf of the county and transmit the signed intergovernmental cooperation agreement and a certified copy of the county council's official action approving the county ordinance authorizing the final proposed agreement to the municipal corporation.(iv) If the county council votes to disapprove the county ordinance authorizing the final proposed agreement or the county council fails to override the county executive's veto of the county ordinance authorizing the final proposed agreement, the county council, through its authorized representative or delegate, shall transmit official notice of the disapproval of the final proposed agreement to the municipal corporation, the county executive and the county manager.(v) Upon receipt of the notice of disapproval of the final proposed agreement, the possible dissolution of the municipal corporation and replacement of its governance by an unincorporated district administered by the county 20250HB1211PN1359 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be deemed to be concluded.Section 3107-D. Referendum.(a) Filing.--(1) Within 30 days of receipt of the fully signed intergovernmental cooperation agreement from the county under section 3106-D(e)(2), the governing body of the municipal corporation shall file a notice with the county board of elections requesting submission of the question of the dissolution of the municipal corporation to the voters of the municipal corporation by referendum.(2) The governing body of the municipal corporation shall include a certified copy of the signed intergovernmental cooperation agreement with the notice of intent for holding the referendum.(3) The governing body of the municipal corporation shall provide copies of the notice of intent filed with the county board of elections to the county council, the county executive and the county manager.(b) Conduct of referendum.--(1) Upon receiving the notice in subsection (a), the county board of elections shall schedule a referendum to be held at the next available election occurring at least 13 weeks after the municipal corporation's receipt of the signed intergovernmental cooperation agreement from the county under section 3106-D(e)(2).(2) The question of the referendum shall be:Shall (name of municipal corporation) dissolve its existing form of governance and become an unincorporated district administered by the county under the essential services transition plan adopted 20250HB1211PN1359 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (date of intergovernmental cooperation agreement)?(3) Upon certification of the election results, the county board of elections shall send notice of the results of the referendum to the governing body of the municipal corporation, the county council, the county executive, the county manager and the Department of Community and Economic Development.(4) If a majority of the electors voting on the question approve, dissolution of the municipal corporation shall occur according to the provisions of section 3108-D.(5) No municipal corporation that has disapproved a referendum under this section shall initiate the processes for municipal dissolution under this article for a period of five years.Section 3108-D. Effect of dissolution.(a) Winding-down of affairs of the municipal corporation.--Following certification by the county board of elections that the referendum has been approved, the governing body of the municipal corporation, with the assistance of the county, shall proceed with the orderly winding-down of the municipal corporation in accordance with the essential services transition plan.(b) Effective date of dissolution.--The effective date of the dissolution of the municipal corporation shall be 180 days following the certification by the county board of elections that the referendum has been approved. Upon the effective date of dissolution, all of the following shall occur:(1) The terms of office of all elected and appointed officers of the municipal corporation shall end.(2) The essential services transition plan adopted by 20250HB1211PN1359 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the intergovernmental cooperation agreement shall take effect as a county ordinance under section 3111-D.(3) The area formerly contained within the municipal corporation shall become an unincorporated district of the county. The district shall have the name designated in the intergovernmental cooperation agreement.(4) The members of the district advisory committee shall be appointed according to the provisions of the essential services transition plan ordinance within 30 days.Section 3109-D. Unincorporated district of county.(a) Designation.--The area formerly contained within a municipal corporation shall, after dissolution under this article, become an unincorporated district of the county in which the area is located. The unincorporated district shall be a limited purpose unit of local government established to be administered by and receive services from the county.(b) Authorized administrative authority.--(1) All legislative, administrative and quasi-judicial powers of the unincorporated district shall be vested in the county.(2) The county manager, through the administrative structure that is deemed to be appropriate and necessary, shall manage the day-to-day operations of the unincorporated district.(3) The county manager shall prepare an annual operating and capital budget and proposed tax, fee and service charge rates for the unincorporated district for the county council's approval.(4) The county council may enact ordinances to provide for the exercise of the powers assigned to the county under 20250HB1211PN1359 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this article and the delivery of public services to the citizens residing in the unincorporated district as the county council deems necessary.(c) Corporate powers.--The county may exercise the following powers in the governance and administration of the unincorporated district:(1) Any power which would have been conferred upon the municipal corporation prior to its dissolution by the laws of this Commonwealth relating to the municipal corporation, including, but not limited to, the municipal code applicable to the dissolved municipality or the home rule charter of the municipal corporation.(2) Any power conferred by statute upon all municipalities in this Commonwealth or all municipalities of the class that the municipal corporation had been prior to dissolution.(3) Any power of the county not denied by this article, the county's home rule charter, as the case may be, or the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(d) District real and personal property.--(1) All assets not sold by the municipal corporation during the course of the winding-down of the municipal corporation's affairs and the date of dissolution as provided for under section 3108-D shall become the property of the unincorporated district. Proceeds resulting from the disposition of any property shall be applied for the exclusive benefit of the residents of the district.(2) The county shall provide as it deems necessary and prudent for the repair and maintenance of all real property and roadways for the benefit of the residents and property 20250HB1211PN1359 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owners of the unincorporated district.(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require the express approval of the General Assembly to dispose of or use any lands acquired with funds under the act of June 22, 1964 (Sp.Sess., P.L.131, No.8), known as the Project 70 Land Acquisition and Borrowing Act, for purposes other than those provided by that act, except that the Commonwealth may succeed in title of the property for the limited purposes established by this subsection.(e) Former municipal debt.--(1) All debt incurred by the municipal corporation before the establishment of the unincorporated district shall be the debt of the district. The county shall provide for the service of the debt from revenues collected within the district.(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require the county to guarantee debt incurred by a dissolved municipality or unincorporated district with revenues from the county's general fund or other source of revenue not derived from taxes collected or fees assessed for the administration of this article or gains from the sale of assets of the dissolved municipality.(f) District debt.--(1) The county may incur debt designating the unincorporated district as the promisor provided that the debt is limited to the exclusive benefit of the residents of the district. For the purposes of 53 Pa.C.S. Pt. VII Subpt. B (relating to indebtedness and borrowing), the district shall constitute a local government unit.(2) Taxes levied by the county in the district may be a 20250HB1211PN1359 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 form of guaranteed revenue to support the debt.(3) Debt incurred under this subsection shall be evaluated against the borrowing base of the district but not the county.(g) Eligibility for State grants and programs.--The county may apply for and be eligible to receive any financial grant, loan or payment on behalf of the district, and the district may participate in any program for which it was eligible when it was a municipal corporation, including, but not limited to, emergency grants and loans from the Commonwealth, payments distributed under the act of June 1, 1956 (1955 P.L.1944, No.655), referred to as the Liquid Fuels Tax Municipal Allocation Law, all programs administered by the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority and all economic and community development programs funded by the Commonwealth.(h) Relationship with existing municipal and other authorities preserved.--(1) Authorities established to provide services to the residents and property owners of a municipal corporation prior to dissolution shall continue to serve the residents and property owners of a district, and members of the authority appointed by the governing body of the municipal corporation prior to dissolution shall continue to serve out the remainder of the members' respective terms.(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of 53 Pa.C.S. § 5607 (relating to purposes and powers) or any other provision of law, subsequent appointments to the authority board which would otherwise be made by the governing body of the municipal corporation shall be made by the county executive in consultation with the district advisory committee subject 20250HB1211PN1359 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to approval by the county council.(i) Pennsylvania Construction Code.--The act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, shall apply to construction, alteration, repair and occupancy of buildings within the district as though the district were a municipality.(j) Continuation of local ordinances, rules and regulations.--(1) Subject to the provisions of the home rule charter and the administrative code, the county council shall be vested with the power to amend, repeal or enact ordinances, rules and regulations governing an unincorporated district.(2) Unless amended or repealed by county council, all ordinances, rules and regulations of the municipal corporation in effect as of the date of dissolution shall remain in effect as if duly adopted under the county home rule charter and the administrative code and shall be enforced by the county within an unincorporated district.Section 3110-D. Revenue, taxation, fees and assessments.(a) Enactment and enforcement.--The county council may, acting as the governing body of the unincorporated district, enact through ordinance and resolution and the county executive, through the county manager, may enforce local tax, fee and service charges for the unincorporated district at any rate or amount as granted by statute to the class of municipal corporation that the unincorporated district was prior to its dissolution under this article or under other applicable State laws, including, but not limited to, the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax Enabling Act.(b) Levy.--20250HB1211PN1359 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The county council shall levy and the county shall collect taxes, fees and service charges authorized by subsection (a) on the subjects of taxation and fees or service charges on behalf of the unincorporated district for the operating and capital expenses of the unincorporated district.(2) If the county levies a tax on the district that would have been a taxation power of the municipal corporation prior to dissolution, revenue derived from the levy shall be restricted to the exclusive benefit of the district.(3) In lieu of the power specified in paragraph (1), the county may levy, on subjects fixed by law for each municipal corporation prior to dissolution, uniform taxes on all unincorporated districts within the county, provided that the revenue derived from the levy is restricted to the exclusive benefit of all districts within the county.(c) Other revenues.--If the dissolved municipality collected or received revenue other than through taxes, fees or service charges, the same shall continue to be paid to the county after dissolution, and the county shall apply the revenue to the exclusive benefit of the district.(d) Uncollected taxes, fees and service charges.--If, after the effective date of dissolution, there are uncollected taxes, fees and service charges, revenues or unsatisfied tax claims or municipal claims, debts or obligations owed to the dissolved municipality, the county may take action authorized by the laws of this Commonwealth to ensure that the uncollected taxes, fees and service charges, revenues or unsatisfied tax claims or municipal claims, debts or obligations of the dissolved municipality are paid to the county for the benefit of the 20250HB1211PN1359 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 district.Section 3111-D. Essential services transition plan ordinance.(a) Effective date of essential services transition plan ordinance.--Upon the dissolution of the municipal corporation and expiration of the intergovernmental cooperation agreement, the essential services transition plan adopted by the agreement shall take effect as an ordinance of the county that applies to the unincorporated district.(b) Revision of essential services transition plan ordinance.--The county, through the county council, may periodically adopt, amend or repeal any provision of the essential services plan ordinance for a specific unincorporated district, provided that the residents of the district are given an opportunity to make local comment on any proposed revision to the ordinance under subsection (c) prior to the governing body's vote revising the ordinance.(c) Local comment meeting.--(1) If the county proposes a revision to the essential services transition plan ordinance of a specific unincorporated district, a special joint meeting of a quorum of the district advisory committee and two members of the county council shall be convened. The chair of the district advisory committee shall preside over the meeting.(2) If the county governing body is elected by electoral district, at least one of the members of the county governing body participating in the special joint meeting shall be a member that represents at least a portion of the unincorporated district.(3) The members of the district advisory committee and the county council shall permit public comment on the county 20250HB1211PN1359 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proposal at the special joint meeting.(4) The members of the special joint meeting shall vote on a resolution regarding the proposal to:(i) recommend the adoption of the proposal;(ii) recommend the adoption of the proposal with amendment;(iii) recommend against the adoption of the proposal; or(iv) abstain from making a recommendation on the proposal.(5) The members participating in the joint special meeting shall provide notice of any resolution adopted at the joint special meeting to each member of the county council.Section 3112-D. District advisory committee.(a) Composition.--(1) Each unincorporated district shall establish a district advisory committee. The district advisory committee shall consist of three members who must be electors residing within the district.(2) The members of the district advisory committee shall be appointed by the county executive subject to approval by a majority of the seated members of the county council.(3) The members of the district advisory committee shall serve at the pleasure of the county executive.(4) At the first meeting of each calendar year, the district advisory committee shall elect a chair who shall preside over each meeting.(b) Meetings.--(1) The district advisory committee shall hold at least four regularly scheduled public meetings in the 20250HB1211PN1359 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unincorporated district each year. The meetings shall be open meetings under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(2) At each meeting, the district advisory committee shall permit public comment and may provide recommendations by resolution to the county as to the governance and administration of the district.(3) A majority of the members of the district advisory committee shall constitute a quorum.Section 3113-D. Financial assistance.The Department of Community and Economic Development shall establish and administer, provided funds are appropriated or available for the purpose, a grant program to assist municipal corporations that are considering dissolution and formation of an unincorporated district administered by the county. Grants may be used by municipal corporations and the county to offset the cost and expenses in the development of essential services transition plans.Section 3114-D. Merger and consolidation and reestablishment of or incorporation as a municipal corporation.(a) Procedure.--(1) For the limited purpose of merging or consolidating with one or more surrounding municipalities under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. C (relating to consolidation and merger), the residents of an unincorporated district may file a petition with the county board of elections as provided in 53 Pa.C.S. §§ 735 (relating to initiative of electors seeking consolidation or merger without new home rule charter) and 735.1 (relating to initiative of electors seeking consolidation or merger with new home rule charter).(2) Residents of the district may be nominated to and 20250HB1211PN1359 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 serve on a commission formed to study merger or consolidation of the district with one or more municipalities.(3) Upon favorable action by the electorate on consolidation or merger, the district advisory committee shall enter into a merger or consolidation agreement with the governing bodies of other municipalities in accordance with 53 Pa.C.S. § 737 (relating to consolidation or merger agreement) and the committee shall provide for the transition of the district into a consolidated or merged municipality with the same powers and duties as provided by law to governing bodies of municipalities.(4) The district advisory committee and the county shall cooperate to expend funds for the purpose of merger, consolidation or reestablishment of the municipal corporation as provided in subsection (b).(b) Reestablishment of or incorporation as a municipal corporation.--The electors of an unincorporated district may reestablish the territory of the district as a municipal corporation or incorporate the territory of the unincorporated district in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth governing the establishment of the intended municipal corporation.(c) Grants permitted.--The Department of Community and Economic Development or the county may issue a loan or grant authorized under applicable laws to a merged, consolidated or subsequently incorporated municipality, including the territory of the district, to provide transitional assistance.(d) Assets.--All assets of the district shall be conveyed to a merged, consolidated or subsequently reestablished or incorporated municipality, including the territory of the 20250HB1211PN1359 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 district.(e) Assumption of debt.--All debt obligations for which the district is the promisor shall be assumed by a merged, consolidated or subsequently reestablished or incorporated municipality, including the territory of the district.Section 3115-D. Severability.The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application to any person or circumstances is held to be invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this article that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 3116-D. Effect of dissolution.The dissolution of a municipal corporation and the creation of an unincorporated district shall not affect the municipal corporation's classification as a municipality for purposes of other laws.Section 2. The provisions of 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 29 are repealed to the extent that they are inconsistent with the provisions of this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1211PN1359 - 27 - 1234567891011121314151617181920